Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-567
Interference with person hunting, trapping, or fishing; aiding or assisting prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person to aid or assist a person who is in violation of section 37-564.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 287.